Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8323. SIENNA PLANTATION MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 7

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8323.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Sienna Plantation Municipal Utility District No. 7.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 932), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.

Sec. 8323.002. NATURE AND PURPOSES OF DISTRICT. (a) The district is a municipal utility district created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(b) The district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, that relate to the construction, acquisition, improvement, operation, or maintenance of macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 932), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8323.051. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties necessary to accomplish the purposes described by Section 8323.002.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 932), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.

Sec. 8323.052. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, applicable to municipal utility districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 932), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.

Sec. 8323.053. AUTHORITY FOR ROAD PROJECTS. Under Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may design, acquire, construct, finance, issue bonds for, improve, operate, maintain, and convey to this state, a county, or a municipality for operation and maintenance macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 932), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.

Sec. 8323.054. ROAD STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS. (a) A road project must meet all applicable construction standards, zoning and subdivision requirements, and regulations of each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the road project is located.

(b) If a road project is not located in the corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality, the road project must meet all applicable construction standards, subdivision requirements, and regulations of each county in which the road project is located.

(c) If the state will maintain and operate the road, the Texas Transportation Commission must approve the plans and specifications of the road project.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 932), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.

Sec. 8323.055. LIMITATION ON USE OF EMINENT DOMAIN. The district may not exercise the power of eminent domain outside the district to acquire a site or easement for a road project authorized by Section 8323.053.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 932), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER C. BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS

Sec. 8323.101. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS FOR ROAD PROJECTS. (a) The district may issue bonds or other obligations payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, impact fees, revenue, contract payments, grants, or other district money, or any combination of those sources, to pay for a road project authorized by Section 8323.053.

(b) The district may not issue bonds payable from ad valorem taxes to finance a road project unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

(c) At the time of issuance, the total principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance road projects and payable from ad valorem taxes may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 932), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.

Sec. 8323.102. TAXES FOR BONDS. At the time the district issues bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, the district shall provide for the annual imposition of a continuing direct ad valorem tax, without limit as to rate or amount, while all or part of the bonds are outstanding as required and in the manner provided by Sections 54.601 and 54.602, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (S.B. 932), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.